src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-erota_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - erota: # Verb 'to differ / erota' - full paradigm
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eruon
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: eruot
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eruou
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: eruommo
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: eruotto
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: erotah
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: eruo
                      
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: eroin
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: eroit
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: eroi
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: eroimmo
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: eroitto
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: erottih
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: eronnuh
     erota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: erottu
